Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.902

Lind dryland research unit—Income from leased property.

(1) The Washington state treasury has been named a devisee of certain property pursuant to a will executed by Cleora Neare on July 14, 1982. Under *RCW 79.01.612, property that has been devised to the state is to be managed and controlled by the department of natural resources. The legislature hereby finds that it is in the best interest of the state to transfer part of the real property devised to the state under the will to Washington State University for use in conjunction with the Washington State University Lind dryland research unit located in Adams county and sell the remaining property for the benefit of the common schools.

(2) Washington State University is hereby granted ownership, management, and control of the real property legally described as all of Section 6, and the west half of Section 5, Township 17, Range 34 East E.W.M., Adams county, Washington, upon close of probate, or sooner if the property can be transferred without cost, other than costs properly allocated to the state as devisee under probate, to Washington State University.

Upon transfer of this property, the parcel shall become part of the Washington State University Lind dryland research unit. Any and all lease income derived from current leases on the property shall be deposited in a dedicated Washington State University local account for the benefit of the Lind dryland research unit.

(3) The department of natural resources shall sell the real property legally described as lots 28 and 29, block 10, Neilson Brothers plat, City of Lind, Adams county and the proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the permanent common school fund.

[ 1997 c 45 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 79.01.612 was recodified as RCW 79.10.030 pursuant to 2003 c 334 s 555.